California, session 20252026, AB2131.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 129881 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:129881. A general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250, shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter if all of the following have been met:(a) The general acute care hospital meets the classification criteria of a long-term care hospital set forth in the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395x(ccc)).(b) The hospital building is a freestanding building used, or designed to be used, exclusively to provide extended hospital care to patients with complex medical and rehabilitative needs.(c) The hospital building has met all the seismic requirements that a hospital was required to meet prior to January 1, 2021.